Hawaii statutes.
[§321-534] Confidential
information. The department and stroke coalition shall not disclose any
confidential information or other data in violation of the federal and state
privacy regulations. [L 2015, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next